Arkansas, session 2025, HB1154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-1-107(b)(1)(B)(i), concerning the
recognition of federal retirement programs, is amended to read as follows:
(B)(i) A member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System
*LJH007*
01/16/2025 9:22:41 AM LJH007

HB1154
shall receive credit for the member's federal service upon the payment of the
cost of service under § 24-7-502(b) and as actuarial equivalent of the
member's benefits to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and the
fulfillment of all other requirements as may be prescribed by the Board of
Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-7-406(e)(1)(C)(iii), concerning
contributory and noncontributory status under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System, is amended to read as follows:
(iii) Effective July 1, 2021, From July 1, 2021, to
June 30, 2025, regardless of an earlier election to be a noncontributory
member of the system, an active member whose status later changes from
nonteacher status to administrator or teacher status under a contract for one
hundred eighty-five (185) days or more shall become a contributory member of
the system otherwise provided for in this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 24-7-411(f), concerning temporary waivers
for electronically reporting and paying contributions to the Arkansas Teacher
Retirement System, is repealed.
(f)(1) An employer shall submit a written request for a temporary
waiver to the board by July 1, 2022, when the employer is unable to:
(A) Report contributions electronically through the
system; or
(B) Pay contributions to the system by electronic
transfer.
(2) A request for a temporary waiver submitted under subdivision
(f)(1) of this section shall include a timeline for when the employer will be
able to comply with the payment and reporting requirements under this
section.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 24-7-706(a)(4)(B)(iii), concerning the
distribution of an Option B annuity under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System, is amended to read as follows:
(iii) Upon the death of a retiree, if more than one
(1) dependent child is designated as the retiree's Option B beneficiary and a
spouse is not designated as the retiree's Option B beneficiary, the retiree's
01/16/2025 9:22:41 AM LJH007

HB1154
reduced annuity one-half (1/2) of the retiree's reduced annuity shall be paid
in equal shares to each dependent child designated as the retiree's Option B
beneficiary.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 24-7-706(d)(3), concerning a residue
beneficiary's eligibility to elect an Option A annuity under the Arkansas
Teacher Retirement System, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The election form must be received by the system within one
hundred twenty (120) days of the death of the retiree by the end of the
fourth full calendar month following the retiree's death.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 24-7-706(g), concerning the effective date
of survivor benefits under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, is
repealed.
(g) A retiree's effective retirement date and the date when survivor
benefits under this section are payable shall be determined by the law in
effect at the time of the retiree's death.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 24-7-709(a)(4), concerning the disposition
of retiree residue under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, is repealed.
(4) If all designated beneficiaries predecease the retiree, the
residue shall be paid to the estate of the most recently deceased designated
beneficiary.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 24-7-710(b)(1)(B)(i)(a), concerning the
effective benefit date of a surviving spouse annuity under the Arkansas
Teacher Retirement System, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Accumulated twenty-five (25) years or more
of credited service and qualified as eligible to receive a retirement annuity
under §§ 24-7-701 and 24-7-702 § 24-7-701 or § 24-7-702; or

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 24-7-1605(a)(2), concerning the eligibility
of a new employee of a PSHE employer to participate in a PSHE plan, is
amended to read as follows:
(2) A new employee of a PSHE employer may participate in the
PSHE plan if the employee:
01/16/2025 9:22:41 AM LJH007

HB1154
(A) Is benefits-eligible as determined by the PSHE
employer;
(B) Is a vested member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System at the time of initial employment; Is either:
(i) A vested member of the Arkansas Teacher
Retirement System at the time of initial employment; or
(ii) A non-vested member of the system who meets the
requirements of a less restrictive PSHE plan adopted by the specific PSHE
employer.
(C) Is not a vested member of the system but meets the
requirements of a less restrictive PSHE plan adopted by the specific PSHE
employer; and
(D)(C) Signs an irrevocable PSHE plan participation form
provided by the system.

SECTION 10. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state
public retirement system are complex; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the
General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System Act, § 24-7-201 et seq., need immediate revision and updating to bring
them into conformance with sound public pension policy and actuarial
requirements; that the revisions and updates are of great importance to
members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of
the State of Arkansas; that as the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System
operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30, an effective date of July 1,
2025, is necessary in order to allow the provisions within this act to begin
on the first day of the fiscal year and to allow for a structured and proper
administration of the procedures referenced in this act; that the updates and
revisions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are of great
importance for actuarial purposes and for the improvement and protection of
member benefits under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this
act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the
members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency
is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
01/16/2025 9:22:41 AM LJH007

HB1154
on July 1, 2025.



































01/16/2025 9:22:41 AM LJH007